Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-903
Secondary boycott; unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in a secondary boycott as herein defined, notwithstanding the provisions of any contract to the contrary; Provided, that nothing herein shall prevent sympathetic strikes in support of those in similar occupations working for other employers in the same craft.

Laws 1959, c. 231, § 3, p. 809.